North Carolina, session 2025, SB557.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to apply to the Department
of Commerce, the corporation with which the Department contracts pursuant to
G.S. 143B-437.01, and other entities working with the Department where the Department, the
corporation, and the entities are using the development tier designations determined pursuant to
G.S. 143B-437.08 for economic development purposes.
SECTION 1.(b) Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, all departments,
authorities, other State and local entities, and entities receiving and using State funds for any
other purpose that use the development tier designations determined pursuant to
G.S. 143B-437.08 for any purpose or program, including, but not limited to, taxes, the North
Carolina Development Farmland Preservation Trust Fund, the Spay and Neuter Program, the
Abandoned Manufactured Home Cleanup Grants Program, the State Wastewater Reserve, the
State Drinking Water Reserve, the Public Safety Assistance Points Grant Program, Oral Health
Preventive Services, Medication Assistance, Qualified Allocation Plan for Low Income Housing
Tax Credits, shall, no later than July 1, 2027, discontinue the use of such designations.
Governmental entities affected by this section include, but are not limited to, the following:
(1) The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.
(2) The Department of Environmental Quality.
(3) The Department of Information Technology.
(4) The Department of Health and Human Services.
(5) The North Carolina Housing Finance Agency.
(6) The Department of Transportation.
(7) The Department of Revenue.
SECTION 1.(c) Each entity to which subsection (b) of this section applies shall
independently develop criteria designed to achieve each program's objectives to be used in place
of development tier designations and shall report by July 1, 2026, on any recommended
legislation and on the developed criteria to the Fiscal Research Division and as follows:
(1) The Departments of Agriculture and Consumer Services and Environmental
Quality to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and
Natural and Economic Resources.
(2) The Department of Information Technology to the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Information Technology.
*S557-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) The Department of Health and Human Services to the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services.
(4) The North Carolina Housing Finance Agency to the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on General Government.
(5) The Department of Transportation to the Joint Legislative Transportation
Oversight Committee.
(6) The Department of Revenue to the Revenue Laws Study Committee.
(7) Any other entity to the oversight committee having jurisdiction over the
primary purpose of the entity.
SECTION 1.(d) Notwithstanding G.S. 143B-437.08(c), an entity required to
discontinue use of the development tier designations no later than July 1, 2027, as required by
this section, may use the last development tier designations published by the Department of
Commerce until the earlier of developed replacement criteria or July 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. G.S. 143B-437.08 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-437.08. Development tier designation.
(a) Tiers Defined. – A development tier one area is a county whose annual ranking is one
of the 40 highest in the State. A development tier two area is a county whose annual ranking is
one of the next 40 50 highest in the State. A development tier three area is a county that is not in
a lower-numbered development tier.
…
(d) Data. – In measuring rates of unemployment and median household income, the
Secretary shall use the latest available data published by a State or federal agency generally
recognized as having expertise concerning the data. In measuring population population,
population density, and population growth, the Secretary shall use the most recent estimates of
population certified by the State Budget Officer. For the purposes of this section, population
statistics do not include people incarcerated in federal or State prisons.
…
(f1) Adjustment for Urban Counties. – Regardless of the actual development factor, any
county that has a population density of greater than 750 people per square mile shall
automatically be ranked as one of the 10 lowest counties.
…
(k) Report. – By November 30 of each year, the Secretary of Commerce shall submit a
written report to the Joint Legislative Economic Development and Global Engagement Oversight
Committee, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Natural and Economic Resources, the
House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Natural and Economic Resources,
and the Fiscal Research Division of the Joint Legislative Economic Development and Global
Engagement Oversight Committee on the tier rankings required by subsection (c) of this section,
including a map of the State whereupon the tier ranking of each county is designated. The report
shall identify, for development tier three areas, census tracts that are low-wealth or rural. For
purposes of this section, a "rural census tract" means a census tract having a population density
of less than 500 people per square mile according to the most recent decennial federal census,
and a "low-wealth census tract" means a census tract for which at least 50 percent (50%) of
households have a median household income that is at least 60 percent (60%) below the county's
median household income."
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this act is effective when it becomes law and applies to
determinations of annual rankings for calendar year 2026 and beyond. The remainder of this act
is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 557-First Edition